Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.010

High school facilities defined.

High school facilities shall mean buildings for occupancy by grades nine through twelve and equipment and furniture for such buildings and shall include major alteration or major remodeling of buildings and the acquisition of new sites and of additions to existing sites, and improvement of sites but only when included as a part of a general plan for the construction, equipping and furnishing of a building or of an alteration or addition to a building. The term shall also (1) include that portion of any building, alteration, equipment, furniture, site and improvement of site allocated to grade nine when included in a plan for facilities to be occupied by grades seven through nine and (2) includes such facilities for grades seven and eight when included in a plan as aforesaid, if the regional committee on school district organization finds that students of these grades who reside in any nonhigh school districts involved are now attending school in the high school district involved under an arrangement which likely will be continued.

[ 1985 c 385 s 31; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.005. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.56.005, 28.56.005.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.